District of Columbia statutes.
29-915

Voting — By mail or by electronic mail.

(a)

The articles or bylaws may provide for either or both of the following types of voting by mail or by electronic mail in accordance with § 29-305.09[:]

(1)

That the secretary shall send to the members a copy of any proposal scheduled to be offered at a meeting, together with the notice of the meeting, and that the mail votes or the electronic mail votes by the members shall be counted together with those cast at the meeting if the mail votes or the electronic mail votes are returned to the association within a specified number of days; and

(2)

That the secretary shall send to any member absent from a meeting an exact copy of the proposal acted upon at the meeting, and that the mail vote or the electronic mail vote of the member upon such proposal, if returned within a specified number of days, shall be counted together with the votes cast at the meeting.

(b)

The articles or bylaws may also determine whether and to what extent the mail votes or the electronic mail votes shall be counted in computing a quorum.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(i)(7), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-925.
2001 Ed., § 29-915.
1981 Ed., § 29-1115.
1973 Ed., § 29-815.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 added “or by electronic mail” at the end of the section heading; added “or by electronic mail in accordance with § 29-305.09” in the introductory language of (a); and added “or the electronic mail vote” and “or the electronic mail votes” throughout (a) and (b).
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.